Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.330

Radio communication.

Every city of the first class maintaining a harbor department may install, maintain, and operate in connection therewith wireless telegraph stations for the handling of official and commercial messages and for communicating with wireless land and shore stations under such regulations as the corporate authorities may prescribe and in accordance with the statutes and regulations of the federal government.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.330. Prior: 1923 c 92 s 1; RRS s 8981-1.]